District of Columbia statutes.
50-404

Employer responsibility.

(a)

An employer shall require an employee who operates a commercial vehicle to have a commercial driver’s license.

(b)

An employer shall not knowingly allow an employee to operate a commercial motor vehicle during any period in which the employee has:

(1)

A driver’s license suspended, revoked, or cancelled;

(2)

Lost the right to operate or been disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle; or

(3)

More than one commercial motor vehicle license.

Sept. 20, 1990, D.C. Law 8-161, § 5, 37 DCR 4665
This section is referenced in § 50-405.
1981 Ed., § 40-1804.